apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x646;&#x62C;&#x627;&#x646;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجانید</l>
          <r>رنجانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجانیده</l>
          <r>رنجانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x646;&#x62C;&#x627;&#x646;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجاند</l>
          <r>رنجاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجانده</l>
          <r>رنجاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رنجان</l>
          <r>رنجاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x641;&#x62A;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رفت</l>
          <r>رفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رفته</l>
          <r>رفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رو</l>
          <r>رفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رو</l>
          <r>رفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رو</l>
          <r>رفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رو</l>
          <r>رفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x634;&#x62A;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رشت</l>
          <r>رشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رشته</l>
          <r>رشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>ریس</l>
          <r>رشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>ریس</l>
          <r>رشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>ریس</l>
          <r>رشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>ریس</l>
          <r>رشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x633;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رسید</l>
          <r>رسیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رسیده</l>
          <r>رسیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رس</l>
          <r>رسیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رس</l>
          <r>رسیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رس</l>
          <r>رسیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>رس</l>
          <r>رسیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="&#x631;&#x633;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x633;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x631;&#x634;&#x62A;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x634;&#x62A;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x631;&#x641;&#x62A;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x641;&#x62A;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x631;&#x646;&#x62C;&#x627;&#x646;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x646;&#x62C;&#x627;&#x646;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x631;&#x646;&#x62C;&#x627;&#x646;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x631;&#x646;&#x62C;&#x627;&#x646;&#x62F;"/></e>
